Oklahoma, session 2025, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 5-107, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-107. A. There is hereby created the “Oklahoma Meat


Consumer Protection Act”.


B. As used in the Oklahoma Meat Consumer Protection Act:


1. “Cell-cultured meat”, also referred to as lab-grown meat,


cultivated meat, clean meat, in vitro meat, imitation meat,


synthetic meat, and fake meat, means a food product developed from


animal cell cultures rather than through traditional raising and


slaughtering of livestock. Cell-cultured meat does not include


imitation meat made of non-meat ingredients including, but not


limited to, plant-based protein;

Req. No. 381 Page 1


2. “Livestock” means animals defined by paragraph 9 of Section


1-3 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. 3. “Meat” means any edible portion of livestock or part


thereof;


3. 4. “Misrepresent” means the use of any untrue, misleading,


or deceptive oral or written statement, advertisement, label,


display, picture, illustration, or sample; and


4. 5. “Represent” means the use of any form of oral or written


statement, advertisement, label, display, picture, illustration, or


sample.


C. Pursuant to the Oklahoma Meat Consumer Protection Act, no


person advertising, offering for sale, or selling meat shall engage


in any misleading or deceptive practices, including, but not limited


to, the following:


1. Misrepresenting the cut, grade, brand, trade name, or weight


or measure of any meat, or misrepresenting a product as meat that is


not derived from harvested production livestock; provided, product


packaging for plant-based items shall not be considered in violation


of the provisions of this paragraph so long as the packaging


displays that the product is derived from plant-based sources in


type that is uniform in size and prominence to the name of the


product;





Req. No. 381 Page 2


2. Using a USDA-quality grade on a product not graded by the


United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) or Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry (ODAFF); or


3. Failing to fully and conspicuously disclose the correct


government grade for any product if the product is represented as


having been graded by the USDA or ODAFF.


D. No person, firm, association, corporation, or any other


entity of this state shall manufacture for sale cell-cultured meat


intended for human consumption.


E. The State Board of Agriculture shall promulgate rules


necessary to enforce compliance with the Oklahoma Meat Consumer


Protection Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-381 MR 12/13/2024 10:20:56 AM



















Req. No. 381 Page 3